Missouri, session 2026, HB2517.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.3600, to read as follows:
407.3600. 1. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Residential real property", real property that is improved by a building or
other structure that has one to four dwelling units;
(2) "Wholesaler", a person or entity that for a fee, commission, or other valuable
consideration, or with the intention, expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or
collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, enters into a purchase
contract for residential real property either:
(a) As the grantee, and assigns or novates the contract to another person or
entity; or
(b) As the grantor, and, without holding legal title to the real property, assigns or
novates the contract to another person or entity.

"Wholesaler" shall not include:
a. An individual who assigns or novates the contract to another individual who is
related by blood; or
b. A person or entity that assigns or novates the contract to a parent, affiliate,
subsidiary, or affiliated group under common control with the person or entity.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2517 2
2. Not less than fourteen calendar days before entering into a contract that
transfers an interest in residential real property, a wholesaler acting as a grantee or a
wholesaler's representative, if applicable, shall provide to the record owner a written
disclosure statement, separate from the purchase contract or agreement, printed in
boldface type font size not less than twelve points, that contains the following disclosure:
"Missouri law requires a wholesaler acting as a grantee, before
entering into a contract or agreement that conveys an interest in
residential real property, to provide certain information to the record
owner in a conspicuous manner printed in boldface type font size not
less than twelve points. Failure by a wholesaler to present or
complete this form shall be considered an unlawful and unfair
practice under the Missouri Merchandising Practices Act. Any
person who enters into an agreement that conveys an interest in
residential real property to a wholesaler acting as a grantee without
receiving this disclosure has a cause of action against the wholesaler.
A wholesaler acting as a grantee is prohibited from entering into a
binding contract to acquire an interest in residential real property
unless this statement is signed and dated by the record owner of the
property.
The owner acknowledges that the person presenting this document is
a wholesaler, as defined in section 407.3600 of the Revised Statutes of
Missouri, and that the owner is advised to seek legal advice before
entering into any agreement or contract with the wholesaler. A
wholesaler is acting on the wholesaler's own behalf and does not
represent the owner in this transaction. A wholesaler enters
assignable contracts with owners and seeks to sell or assign the
wholesaler's interest for a profit. The wholesaler may assign the
wholesaler's interest in the purchase contract to a third party without
the owner's consent before closing. The wholesaler may charge a fee
to the third-party buyer separately for profit. The agreed purchase
price between the owner and wholesaler may be below market value
and is conveyed voluntarily.
The owner acknowledges disclosure of the information provided in
this form by signing and dating below:
__________ (Property owner signature) ___ (date)
__________ (Wholesaler signature) ___ (date)."

HCS HB 2517 3
3. A wholesaler acting as the grantee shall not enter into a binding contract that
transfers an interest in residential real property until both the wholesaler and the record
owner of the property sign and date the disclosure statement required under subsection
2 of this section.
4. If a wholesaler acting as the grantee fails to make the disclosures required
under subsection 2 of this section before entering into a binding contract that transfers
an interest in residential real property, the record owner of the residential real property
may cancel the contract at any time prior to the close of escrow without penalty and the
escrow or closing agent shall disburse any earnest money paid by the wholesaler to the
record owner within thirty days after such cancellation.
5. Provisions of this section shall not be modified or waived by any oral or
written agreement. Any portion of an agreement that is executed, modified, or extended
after the effective date of this section that modifies or waives any provision of this
section shall be null and void.
6. Any violation of this section shall be considered an unlawful practice under
the Missouri merchandising practices act under this chapter. A party that enters into an
agreement without receiving the disclosures required under subsection 2 of this section
may bring a private action against a wholesaler.
7. The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this
section. If the attorney general finds that a violation occurred, the attorney general may
commence a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that a
violation occurred, the court may grant damages, injunctive relief, attorney's fees, and
any such other relief the court finds appropriate.
✔